Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.102

Effect of certain accumulated vacation leave on retirement benefits.

RCW 43.01.044 shall not result in any increase in retirement benefits. The rights extended to state officers and employees under RCW 43.01.044 are not intended to and shall not have any effect on retirement benefits under this chapter.

[ 1983 c 283 s 4. Formerly RCW 41.40.800.]